Utah statutes.
53-1-114.   Office of Executive Protection -- Security and protection for
governor and family -- Protection for other officials.
(1)  The Office of Executive Protection shall provide all necessary security
and protection for the governor and the governor's immediate family.
(2) (a)  Subject to the direction of the commissioner, the Office of Executive
Protection may provide protection to other public officials.
(b)  That protection may not extend for more than 15 days without review and
approval by majority vote of the president of the Senate, the speaker of the
House, and the commissioner.
(c)  Review and approval by the same majority vote shall be required at the
end of each 15-day period.
